District of Columbia statutes.
42-701

Words of inheritance unnecessary.

No words of inheritance shall be necessary in a deed or will to create a fee simple estate; but every conveyance or devise of real estate shall be construed and held to pass a fee simple estate or other entire estate of the grantor or testator, unless a contrary intention shall appear by express terms or be necessarily implied therein.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 502
1981 Ed., § 45-401.
1973 Ed., § 45-201.